Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.175

Physician health and voluntary substance use disorder monitoring programs (as amended by 2023 c 425).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) In lieu of disciplinary action under RCW 18.130.160 and if the disciplining authority determines that the unprofessional conduct may be the result of an applicable impairing or potentially impairing health condition, the disciplining authority may refer the license holder to a physician health program or a voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program approved by the disciplining authority.

The cost of evaluation and treatment shall be the responsibility of the license holder, but the responsibility does not preclude payment by an employer, existing insurance coverage, or other sources. Evaluation and treatment shall be provided by providers approved by the entity or the commission. The disciplining authority may also approve the use of out-of-state programs. Referral of the license holder to the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program shall be done only with the consent of the license holder. Referral to the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program may also include probationary conditions for a designated period of time. If the license holder does not consent to be referred to the program or does not successfully complete the program, the disciplining authority may take appropriate action under RCW 18.130.160 which includes suspension of the license unless or until the disciplining authority, in consultation with the director of the applicable program, determines the license holder is able to practice safely. The secretary shall adopt uniform rules for the evaluation by the disciplining authority of return to substance use or program violation on the part of a license holder in the program. The evaluation shall encourage program participation with additional conditions, in lieu of disciplinary action, when the disciplining authority determines that the license holder is able to continue to practice with reasonable skill and safety.

(2) In addition to approving the physician health program or the voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program that may receive referrals from the disciplining authority, the disciplining authority may establish by rule requirements for participation of license holders who are not being investigated or monitored by the disciplining authority. License holders voluntarily participating in the approved programs without being referred by the disciplining authority shall not be subject to disciplinary action under RCW 18.130.160 for their impairing or potentially impairing health condition, and shall not have their participation made known to the disciplining authority, if they meet the requirements of this section and the program in which they are participating.

(3) The license holder shall sign a waiver allowing the program to release information to the disciplining authority if the licensee does not comply with the requirements of this section or is unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety. The physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder program shall report to the disciplining authority any license holder who fails to comply with the requirements of this section or the program or who, in the opinion of the program, is unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety. License holders shall report to the disciplining authority if they fail to comply with this section or do not complete the program's requirements. License holders may, upon the agreement of the program and disciplining authority, reenter the program if they have previously failed to comply with this section.

(4) Program records including, but not limited to, case notes, progress notes, laboratory reports, evaluation and treatment records, electronic and written correspondence within the program, and between the program and the participant or other involved entities including, but not limited to, employers, credentialing bodies, referents, or other collateral sources, relating to license holders referred to or voluntarily participating in approved programs are confidential and exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW and shall not be subject to discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence except:

(a) To defend any civil action by a license holder regarding the restriction or revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges, or termination of a license holder's employment. In such an action, the program will, upon subpoena issued by either party to the action, and upon the requesting party seeking a protective order for the requested disclosure, provide to both parties of the action written disclosure that includes the following information:

(i) Verification of a health care professional's participation in the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program as it relates to aspects of program involvement at issue in the civil action;

(ii) The dates of participation;

(iii) Whether or not the program identified an impairing or potentially impairing health condition;

(iv) Whether the health care professional was compliant with the requirements of the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program; and

(v) Whether the health care professional successfully completed the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program; and

(b) Records provided to the disciplining authority for cause as described in subsection (3) of this section. Program records relating to license holders mandated to the program, through order or by stipulation, by the disciplining authority or relating to license holders reported to the disciplining authority by the program for cause, must be released to the disciplining authority at the request of the disciplining authority. Records held by the disciplining authority under this section are exempt from chapter 42.56 RCW and are not subject to discovery by subpoena except by the license holder.

(5) This section does not affect an employer's right or ability to make employment-related decisions regarding a license holder. This section does not restrict the authority of the disciplining authority to take disciplinary action for any other unprofessional conduct.

(6) A person who, in good faith, reports information or takes action in connection with this section is immune from civil liability for reporting information or taking the action.

(a) The immunity from civil liability provided by this section shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of this section, and applies to both license holders and students and trainees when students and trainees of the applicable professions are served by the program. The persons entitled to immunity shall include:

(i) An approved physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program;

(ii) The professional association affiliated with the program;

(iii) Members, employees, or agents of the program or associations;

(iv) Persons reporting a license holder as being possibly impaired or providing information about the license holder's impairment; and

(v) Professionals supervising or monitoring the course of the program participant's treatment or rehabilitation.

(b) The courts are strongly encouraged to impose sanctions on program participants and their attorneys whose allegations under this subsection are not made in good faith and are without either reasonable objective, substantive grounds, or both.

(c) The immunity provided in this section is in addition to any other immunity provided by law.

(7) In the case of a person who is applying to be a substance use disorder professional or substance use disorder professional trainee certified under chapter 18.205 RCW, if the person is:

(a) Less than one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the duration of time that the person may be required to participate in an approved substance use disorder monitoring program may not exceed the amount of time necessary for the person to achieve one year in recovery; or

(b) At least one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the person may not be required to participate in the approved substance use disorder monitoring program.

(8) In the case of a person who is applying to be an agency affiliated counselor ((registered))credentialed under chapter 18.19 RCW and practices or intends to practice as a peer counselor in an agency, as defined in RCW 18.19.020, if the person is:

(a) Less than one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the duration of time that the person may be required to participate in the approved substance use disorder monitoring program may not exceed the amount of time necessary for the person to achieve one year in recovery; or

(b) At least one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the person may not be required to participate in the approved substance use disorder monitoring program.

[ 2023 c 425 s 25; 2022 c 43 s 10. Prior: 2019 c 446 s 43; 2019 c 444 s 21; 2006 c 99 s 7; 2005 c 274 s 233; 1998 c 132 s 10; 1993 c 367 s 3; 1991 c 3 s 270; 1988 c 247 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.

PDFRCW 18.130.175

Physician health and voluntary substance use disorder monitoring programs (as amended by 2023 c 469).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) In lieu of disciplinary action under RCW 18.130.160 and if the disciplining authority determines that the unprofessional conduct may be the result of an applicable impairing or potentially impairing health condition, the disciplining authority may refer the license holder to a physician health program or a voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program approved by the disciplining authority.

The cost of evaluation and treatment shall be the responsibility of the license holder, but the responsibility does not preclude payment by an employer, existing insurance coverage, or other sources. Evaluation and treatment shall be provided by providers approved by the entity or the commission. The disciplining authority may also approve the use of out-of-state programs. Referral of the license holder to the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program shall be done only with the consent of the license holder. Referral to the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program may also include probationary conditions for a designated period of time. If the license holder does not consent to be referred to the program or does not successfully complete the program, the disciplining authority may take appropriate action under RCW 18.130.160 which includes suspension of the license unless or until the disciplining authority, in consultation with the director of the applicable program, determines the license holder is able to practice safely. The secretary shall adopt uniform rules for the evaluation by the disciplining authority of return to substance use or program violation on the part of a license holder in the program. The evaluation shall encourage program participation with additional conditions, in lieu of disciplinary action, when the disciplining authority determines that the license holder is able to continue to practice with reasonable skill and safety.

(2) In addition to approving the physician health program or the voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program that may receive referrals from the disciplining authority, the disciplining authority may establish by rule requirements for participation of license holders who are not being investigated or monitored by the disciplining authority. License holders voluntarily participating in the approved programs without being referred by the disciplining authority shall not be subject to disciplinary action under RCW 18.130.160 for their impairing or potentially impairing health condition, and shall not have their participation made known to the disciplining authority, if they meet the requirements of this section and the program in which they are participating.

(3) The license holder shall sign a waiver allowing the program to release information to the disciplining authority if the licensee does not comply with the requirements of this section or is unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety. The physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder program shall report to the disciplining authority any license holder who fails to comply with the requirements of this section or the program or who, in the opinion of the program, is unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety. License holders shall report to the disciplining authority if they fail to comply with this section or do not complete the program's requirements. License holders may, upon the agreement of the program and disciplining authority, reenter the program if they have previously failed to comply with this section.

(4) Program records including, but not limited to, case notes, progress notes, laboratory reports, evaluation and treatment records, electronic and written correspondence within the program, and between the program and the participant or other involved entities including, but not limited to, employers, credentialing bodies, referents, or other collateral sources, relating to license holders referred to or voluntarily participating in approved programs are confidential and exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW and shall not be subject to discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence except:

(a) To defend any civil action by a license holder regarding the restriction or revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges, or termination of a license holder's employment. In such an action, the program will, upon subpoena issued by either party to the action, and upon the requesting party seeking a protective order for the requested disclosure, provide to both parties of the action written disclosure that includes the following information:

(i) Verification of a health care professional's participation in the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program as it relates to aspects of program involvement at issue in the civil action;

(ii) The dates of participation;

(iii) Whether or not the program identified an impairing or potentially impairing health condition;

(iv) Whether the health care professional was compliant with the requirements of the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program; and

(v) Whether the health care professional successfully completed the physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program; and

(b) Records provided to the disciplining authority for cause as described in subsection (3) of this section. Program records relating to license holders mandated to the program, through order or by stipulation, by the disciplining authority or relating to license holders reported to the disciplining authority by the program for cause, must be released to the disciplining authority at the request of the disciplining authority. Records held by the disciplining authority under this section are exempt from chapter 42.56 RCW and are not subject to discovery by subpoena except by the license holder.

(5) This section does not affect an employer's right or ability to make employment-related decisions regarding a license holder. This section does not restrict the authority of the disciplining authority to take disciplinary action for any other unprofessional conduct.

(6) A person who, in good faith, reports information or takes action in connection with this section is immune from civil liability for reporting information or taking the action.

(a) The immunity from civil liability provided by this section shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of this section, and applies to both license holders and students and trainees when students and trainees of the applicable professions are served by the program. The persons entitled to immunity shall include:

(i) An approved physician health program or voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program;

(ii) The professional association affiliated with the program;

(iii) Members, employees, or agents of the program or associations;

(iv) Persons reporting a license holder as being possibly impaired or providing information about the license holder's impairment; and

(v) Professionals supervising or monitoring the course of the program participant's treatment or rehabilitation.

(b) The courts are strongly encouraged to impose sanctions on program participants and their attorneys whose allegations under this subsection are not made in good faith and are without either reasonable objective, substantive grounds, or both.

(c) The immunity provided in this section is in addition to any other immunity provided by law.

(7) In the case of a person who is applying to be a substance use disorder professional or substance use disorder professional trainee certified under chapter 18.205 RCW, an agency affiliated counselor registered under chapter 18.19 RCW, or a peer specialist or peer specialist trainee certified under chapter 18.420 RCW, if the person is:

(a) Less than one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the duration of time that the person may be required to participate in an approved substance use disorder monitoring program may not exceed the amount of time necessary for the person to achieve one year in recovery; or

(b) At least one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the person may not be required to participate in the approved substance use disorder monitoring program.

(8) ((In the case of a person who is applying to be an agency affiliated counselor registered under chapter 18.19 RCW and practices or intends to practice as a peer counselor in an agency, as defined in RCW 18.19.020, if the person is:

(a) Less than one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the duration of time that the person may be required to participate in the approved substance use disorder monitoring program may not exceed the amount of time necessary for the person to achieve one year in recovery; or

(b) At least one year in recovery from a substance use disorder, the person may not be required to participate in the approved substance use disorder monitoring program))The provisions of subsection (7) of this section apply to any person employed as a peer specialist as of July 1, 2025, participating in a program under this section as of July 1, 2025, and applying to become a certified peer specialist under RCW 18.420.050, regardless of when the person's participation in a program began. To this extent, subsection (7) of this section applies retroactively, but in all other respects it applies prospectively.

[ 2023 c 469 s 19; 2022 c 43 s 10. Prior: 2019 c 446 s 43; 2019 c 444 s 21; 2006 c 99 s 7; 2005 c 274 s 233; 1998 c 132 s 10; 1993 c 367 s 3; 1991 c 3 s 270; 1988 c 247 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 18.130.175 was amended twice during the 2023 legislative session, each without reference to the other. For rule of construction concerning sections amended more than once during the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective date—2006 c 99 s 7: "Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 99 s 11.]

Finding—Intent—Severability—1998 c 132: See notes following RCW 18.71.0195.

Legislative intent—1988 c 247: "Existing law does not provide for a program for rehabilitation of health professionals whose competency may be impaired due to the abuse of alcohol and other drugs.

It is the intent of the legislature that the disciplining authorities seek ways to identify and support the rehabilitation of health professionals whose practice or competency may be impaired due to the abuse of drugs or alcohol. The legislature intends that such health professionals be treated so that they can return to or continue to practice their profession in a way which safeguards the public. The legislature specifically intends that the disciplining authorities establish an alternative program to the traditional administrative proceedings against such health professionals." [ 1988 c 247 s 1.]